New Jersey, session 222, A3559.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of section 7 of P.L.1997, c.24 (C.40:12-15.7) to the contrary, the governing body of any municipality, the voters of which have approved a proposition authorizing the imposition of an annual levy for the development or maintenance of lands acquired for recreation and conservation purposes, may, by adoption of an ordinance, appropriate and expend amounts raised by the levy for the purpose of developing or maintaining other land devoted to recreation and conservation purposes, whether such land is owned by the municipality or another public entity, so long as the land is located within the municipality and the improvements will inure to the benefit of the residents of the municipality. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.